Idaho, session 2025, H0273.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 18-3302C, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-3302C. PROHIBITED CONDUCT. Any person obtaining a license under
the provisions of section 18-3302, Idaho Code, or carrying a concealed
deadly weapon pursuant to the provisions of section 18-3302(4)(f), Idaho
Code, shall not:
(1) Carry a concealed weapon in a courthouse; juvenile detention fa-
cility or jail; public or private school, except as provided in subsection
(4)(g) of section 18-3302D(4)(g) or (h), Idaho Code; provided that this sub-
section shall not apply to:
(a) Peace officers while acting within the scope of their employment;
(b) Security personnel while actually engaged in their employment; or
(c) Any person who is authorized to carry a weapon by a person, board or
other entity having authority over the building or facility; or
(2) Provide information on the application for a permit to carry a con-
cealed weapon knowing the same to be untrue.
Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a
misdemeanor.
SECTION 2. That Section 18-3302D, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
18-3302D. POSSESSING WEAPONS OR FIREARMS ON SCHOOL PROPERTY.
(1)(a) It shall be unlawful and is a misdemeanor for any person to pos-
sess a firearm or other deadly or dangerous weapon while on the property


of a school or in those portions of any building, stadium or other struc-
ture on school grounds which that, at the time of the violation, were be-
ing used for an activity sponsored by or through a school in this state
or while riding school-provided transportation.
(b) The provisions of this section regarding the possession of a
firearm or other deadly or dangerous weapon on school property shall
also apply to students of schools while attending or participating in
any school-sponsored activity, program or event regardless of loca-
tion.
(2) Definitions. As used in this section:
(a) "Deadly or dangerous weapon" means any weapon as defined in 18
U.S.C. 930;
(b) "Employee" means an officer, board member, commissioner, execu-
tive, elected or appointed official, and any other school employees or
faculty members;
(b) (c) "Firearm" means any firearm as defined in 18 U.S.C. 921;
(d) "Immediate control" means to possess on one's person and within
one's own clothing in a manner so that no other person may easily gain
control;
(c) (e) "Minor" means a person under the age of eighteen (18) years;
(d) (f) "Possess" means to bring an object, or to cause it to be brought,
onto the property of a public or, private elementary or secondary
school, religious, or charter school with any amount of student popula-
tion, or onto a vehicle being used for school-provided transportation,
or to exercise dominion and control over an object located anywhere on
such property or vehicle. For purposes of subsection (1)(b) of this
section, "possess" shall also mean to bring an object onto the site of a
school-sponsored activity, program or event, regardless of location,
or to exercise dominion and control over an object located anywhere on
such a site;
(e) (g) "School" means a any private or, public elementary or secondary
school., religious, or charter school with any amount of student popu-
lation;
(h) "School district" means any public or private charter school dis-
trict;
(i) "School employee" means an employee of the school or school
district, including superintendents, assistant superintendents,
principals, assistant principals, teachers, guidance counselors, li-
brarians, teacher's aides, coaches, business managers, secretaries,
administrative assistants, janitors, bus drivers, volunteers, or other
employees on contract with the district. School employee does not in-
clude anyone who is a student enrolled in the school district;
(j) "School property" means property owned, used, or leased by a school
district where the school employee is employed; and
(k) "POST training" means a firearms instruction program administered
by the Idaho peace officer standards and training (POST) council.
(3) Right to search students or minors. For purposes of enforcing the
provisions of this section, employees of a school district shall have the
right to search all students or minors, including their belongings and lock-
ers, that are reasonably believed to be in violation of the provisions of


this section, or in violation of applicable school rule or district policy,
regarding the possessing of a firearm or other deadly or dangerous weapon.
(4) The provisions of this section shall not apply to the following per-
sons:
(a) A peace officer;
(b) A qualified retired law enforcement officer licensed under section
18-3302H, Idaho Code;
(c) A person who lawfully possesses a firearm or deadly or dangerous
weapon as an appropriate part of a program, an event, activity or other
circumstance approved by the board of trustees or governing board;
(d) A person or persons complying with the provisions of section
19-202A, Idaho Code;
(e) Any adult over eighteen (18) years of age and not enrolled in a pub-
lic or private elementary or secondary school who has lawful possession
of a firearm or other deadly or dangerous weapon, secured and locked in
his vehicle in an unobtrusive, nonthreatening manner;
(f) A person who lawfully possesses a firearm or other deadly or danger-
ous weapon in a private vehicle while delivering minor children, stu-
dents or school employees to and from school or a school activity; or
(g) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 18-3302C, Idaho Code, a
person or an employee of the school or school district who is authorized
to carry a firearm with the permission of the board of trustees of the
school district or the governing board., provided that:
(i) The only authorized firearms deemed appropriate for a school
employee to carry concealed shall be limited to handguns; and
(ii) The only authorized firearm ammunition deemed appropriate
for a school employee to carry loaded in a concealed handgun shall
be hollow-point ammunition. Ball ammunition shall not be carried
in any firearm by a school employee on school grounds; or
(h) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 18-3302C, Idaho Code,
and with permission from a school's corresponding school board, a
school employee may carry a concealed weapon, issued pursuant to sec-
tion 18-3302K, Idaho Code, as long as the firearm or deadly weapon is
concealed and the school employee maintains immediate control over
the firearm or deadly weapon. Such employee shall, at minimum, pos-
sesses an enhanced concealed license to carry concealed weapons or have
completed POST training from a POST-certified person who possesses a
valid, numbered certificate issued by the Idaho peace officer stan-
dards and training council authorizing such person to serve as a peace
officer or reserve police officer. POST training shall consist of no
more than six (6) days of school defense training and include scenario
response and firearm proficiency. It shall be at the discretion of the
corresponding school board to define the level of training the school
board requires within its training criteria, but the school board shall
not prevent a school employee from concealed carry at the school as long
as the school employee has completed the corresponding school board's
required training and certification criteria.
(5) No school employee who lawfully carries a concealed firearm or
other deadly weapon in accordance with the provisions of subsection (4)(h)
of this section shall:


(a) Be compelled to disclose the possession or presence of any firearm
or deadly weapon, except as provided in subsection (6) of this section
or to an Idaho peace officer who is conducting a lawful investigation
when such information is reasonably related to the investigation; or
(b) Be subject to any disciplinary action, retaliation, or adverse work
conditions by any Idaho school or school district for possession of a
firearm on school property, unless such school employee fails to comply
with the provisions of this section or other Idaho firearms laws.
(6) A school employee that has met the school board-specified standards
of training and certification and desires to carry a concealed weapon on
school property shall inform the principal of the school and superintendent
of the school district where he is employed and shall provide them with a
copy of the enhanced concealed carry license or the POST training completion
certification. The principal and superintendent may share the information
with the school board; however, the principal, superintendent, and school
board shall maintain the confidentiality of the names of those employees
with enhanced concealed carry licenses and the copies of their enhanced
concealed carry licenses. The copy of an employee's enhanced concealed
carry license or POST training certification shall not be included in the
employee's personnel file. Such information shall be shared with all local
law enforcement, including the city police department, if applicable, the
county sheriff, and the Idaho state police, along with a photo of the school
employee in order to assist law enforcement officers in the exercise of
their duties. The school employee shall specifically ensure that if a law
enforcement school resource officer is assigned to such employee's respec-
tive school, such officer is also aware of the employee's possession of an
enhanced concealed carry license or POST training certification. In addi-
tion to the course of fire and legal classroom curriculum associated with the
enhanced concealed carry certification or POST training, it is recommended
that a school district offer:
(a) Recurrent active shooter refresher training with the district's
armed concealed carry employees and local police agencies or sheriff's
offices; and
(b) A range qualification day at least twice a year to enhance and en-
sure ongoing proper handling, accuracy, and proficiency.
(7) Nothing in subsection (4) of this section shall limit the right of
an owner of private property, including a private school, from permitting or
prohibiting the carrying of a concealed firearm or other deadly weapon on his
property.
(8) No cause of action shall lie or be maintained for civil damages in
any court of this state against a school, school district, or school employee
where the claim arises out of the lawful possession, lawful action, lawful
use, or nonuse of a deadly weapon by a school employee on school property and
who does so without the consent of the board but in accordance with subsec-
tion (4)(h) of this section.
(9) No public school shall display any signage whatsoever indicating
that school property is a gun-free zone.
(10) No school employee shall be required to carry a concealed weapon on
school property without his consent. No school employee shall have the duty
arising from this section to carry or use a deadly weapon on school property.


(11) No school employee shall be held civilly or criminally liable for
deciding to engage or not to engage in an armed confrontation with an active
shooter as long as the school employee's actions are lawful and in accordance
with laws pertaining to self-defense and the defense of others who are in
life-threatening immediate harm or danger. The decision to use a firearm or
other deadly weapon during a life-threatening incident inside of a school
or on school property shall lie solely within the school employee and shall
be a personal decision. The mere possession of a firearm and enhanced con-
cealed carry license alone shall not mandate that a school employee take
armed action. If the armed school employee does engage an armed assailant,
the armed employee shall be responsible for any and all bullet projectiles
the employee fires with his firearm. School employees who decide to carry a
concealed firearm on school property may consider:
(a) What is in the background of an armed assailant in the event the em-
ployee fires his weapon;
(b) That it is a certainty that active shooter incidents or other armed
incidents that occur within a school are always dynamic and rapidly
evolving;
(c) That school employees who decide to carry a concealed firearm on
school property must accept the responsibility freely and voluntarily
while also ensuring they understand the various potential variables
they could be faced with; and
(d) That the decision to carry a concealed firearm in a school setting
comes with a huge responsibility, and the personal responsibility un-
dertaken cannot be understated.
(5) (12) Penalties. Persons who are found guilty of violating the pro-
visions of this section may be sentenced to a jail term of not more than one
(1) year or fined an amount not in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or
both. If a violator is a student and under the age of eighteen (18) years,
the court may place the violator on probation and suspend the juvenile deten-
tion or fine or both as long as the violator is enrolled in a program of study
recognized by the court that, upon successful completion, will grant the vi-
olator a general equivalency diploma (GED) or a high school diploma or other
educational program authorized by the court. Upon successful completion of
the terms imposed by the court, the court shall discharge the offender from
serving the remainder of the sentence. If the violator does not complete, is
suspended from, or otherwise withdraws from the program of study imposed by
the court, the court, upon receiving such information, shall order the vio-
lator to commence serving the sentence provided for in this section.
SECTION 3. That Section 74-106, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
74-106. RECORDS EXEMPT FROM DISCLOSURE -- PERSONNEL RECORDS, PER-
SONAL INFORMATION, HEALTH RECORDS, PROFESSIONAL DISCIPLINE. The following
records are exempt from disclosure:
(1) Except as provided in this subsection, all personnel records of
a current or former public official other than the public official's pub-
lic service or employment history, classification, pay grade and step,
longevity, gross salary and salary history, including bonuses, severance
packages, other compensation or vouchered and unvouchered expenses for


which reimbursement was paid, status, workplace and employing agency. All
other personnel information relating to a public employee or applicant,
including but not limited to information regarding sex, race, marital sta-
tus, birth date, home address and telephone number, social security number,
driver's license number, applications, testing and scoring materials,
grievances, correspondence and performance evaluations, shall not be dis-
closed to the public without the employee's or applicant's written consent.
Names of applicants to classified or merit system positions shall not be dis-
closed to the public without the applicant's written consent. Disclosure of
names as part of a background check is permitted. Names of the five (5) final
applicants to all other positions shall be available to the public. If such
group is less than five (5) finalists, then the entire list of applicants
shall be available to the public. A public official or authorized represen-
tative may inspect and copy his personnel records, except for material used
to screen and test for employment.
(2) Retired employees' and retired public officials' home addresses,
home telephone numbers and other financial and nonfinancial membership
records; and active and inactive member financial and membership records
and mortgage portfolio loan documents maintained by the public employee re-
tirement system. Financial statements prepared by retirement system staff,
funding agents and custodians concerning the investment of assets of the
public employee retirement system of Idaho are not considered confidential
under this chapter.
(3) Information and records submitted to the Idaho state lottery for
the performance of background investigations of employees, lottery retail-
ers and major procurement contractors; audit records of lottery retailers,
vendors and major procurement contractors submitted to or performed by the
Idaho state lottery; validation and security tests of the state lottery for
lottery games; and business records and information submitted pursuant to
sections 67-7412(8) and (9) and 67-7421(8) and (9), Idaho Code, and such
documents and information obtained and held for the purposes of lottery se-
curity and investigative action as determined by lottery rules, unless the
public interest in disclosure substantially outweighs the private need for
protection from public disclosure.
(4) Records of a personal nature as follows:
(a) Records of personal debt filed with a public agency pursuant to law;
(b) Personal bank records compiled by a public depositor for the pur-
pose of public funds transactions conducted pursuant to law;
(c) Records of ownership of financial obligations and instruments of a
public agency, such as bonds, compiled by the public agency pursuant to
law;
(d) Records with regard to the ownership of or security interests in
registered public obligations;
(e) Vital statistics records;
(f) Military records as described in and pursuant to section 65-301,
Idaho Code;
(g) Social security numbers; and
(h) The following personal data identifiers for an individual may be
disclosed only in the following redacted format:
(i) The initials of any minor children of the individual;


(ii) A date of birth in substantially the following format:
XX/XX/birth year;
(iii) The last four (4) digits of a financial account number in
substantially the following format: XXXXX1234;
(iv) The last four (4) digits of a driver's license number or
state-issued personal identification card number in substan-
tially the following format: XXXXX350F; and
(v) The last four (4) digits of an employer identification number
or business's taxpayer identification number.
(5) Information in an income or other tax return measured by items of
income or sales that is gathered by a public agency for the purpose of admin-
istering the tax, except such information to the extent disclosed in a writ-
ten decision of the tax commission pursuant to a taxpayer protest of a defi-
ciency determination by the tax commission, under the provisions of section
63-3045B, Idaho Code.
(6) Records of a personal nature related directly or indirectly to the
application for and provision of statutory services rendered to persons
applying for public care for people who are elderly, indigent or have mental
or physical disabilities or participation in an environmental or a public
health study, provided the provisions of this subsection making records
exempt from disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or
information contained in those records are necessary for a background check
on an individual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of
firearms, guns or ammunition.
(7) Employment security information, except that a person may agree,
through written, informed consent, to waive the exemption so that a third
party may obtain information pertaining to the person, unless access to the
information by the person is restricted by subsection (3)(a), (b) or (d)
of section 74-113, Idaho Code. Notwithstanding the provisions of section
74-113, Idaho Code, a person may not review identifying information con-
cerning an informant who reported to the department of labor a suspected
violation by the person of the employment security law, chapter 13, title 72,
Idaho Code, under an assurance of confidentiality. As used in this section
and in chapter 13, title 72, Idaho Code, "employment security information"
means any information descriptive of an identifiable person or persons that
is received by, recorded by, prepared by, furnished to or collected by the
department of labor or the industrial commission in the administration of
the employment security law.
(8) Any personal records, other than names, business addresses and
business phone numbers, such as parentage, race, religion, sex, height,
weight, tax identification and social security numbers, financial worth or
medical condition submitted to any public agency pursuant to a statutory
requirement for licensing, certification, permit or bonding.
(9) Unless otherwise provided by agency rule, information obtained as
part of an inquiry into a person's fitness to be granted or retain a license,
certificate, permit, privilege, commission or position and private associ-
ation peer review committee records authorized in title 54, Idaho Code. Any
agency that has records exempt from disclosure under the provisions of this
subsection shall annually make available a statistical summary of the number
and types of matters considered and their disposition.


(10) The records, findings, determinations and decisions of any prelit-
igation screening panel formed under chapters 10 and 23, title 6, Idaho Code.
(11) Complaints received by the board of medicine and investigations
and informal proceedings, including informal proceedings of any committee
of the board of medicine, pursuant to chapter 18, title 54, Idaho Code, and
rules adopted thereunder.
(12) Records of the department of health and welfare or a public health
district that identify a person infected with a reportable disease.
(13) Records of hospital care, medical records, including prescrip-
tions, drug orders, records or any other prescription information that
specifically identifies an individual patient, prescription records main-
tained by the board of pharmacy under sections 37-2726 and 37-2730A, Idaho
Code, records of psychiatric care or treatment and professional counseling
records relating to an individual's condition, diagnosis, care or treat-
ment, provided the provisions of this subsection making records exempt from
disclosure shall not apply to the extent that such records or information
contained in those records are necessary for a background check on an indi-
vidual that is required by federal law regulating the sale of firearms, guns
or ammunition.
(14) Information collected pursuant to the directory of new hires act,
chapter 16, title 72, Idaho Code.
(15) Personal information contained in motor vehicle and driver records
that is exempt from disclosure under the provisions of chapter 2, title 49,
Idaho Code.
(16) Records of the financial status of prisoners pursuant to subsec-
tion (2) of section 20-607, Idaho Code.
(17) Records of the Idaho state police or department of correction re-
ceived or maintained pursuant to section 19-5514, Idaho Code, relating to
DNA databases and databanks.
(18) Records of the department of health and welfare relating to a sur-
vey, resurvey or complaint investigation of a licensed nursing facility.
Such records shall, however, be subject to disclosure as public records as
soon as the facility in question has received the report and no later than the
fourteenth day following the date that department of health and welfare rep-
resentatives officially exit the facility pursuant to federal regulations.
Provided however, that for purposes of confidentiality, no record shall be
released under this section that specifically identifies any nursing facil-
ity resident.
(19) Records and information contained in the registry of immunizations
against childhood diseases maintained in the department of health and wel-
fare, including information disseminated to others from the registry by the
department of health and welfare.
(20) Records of the Idaho housing and finance association (IHFA) relat-
ing to the following:
(a) Records containing personal financial, family, health or similar
personal information submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA;
(b) Records submitted to or otherwise obtained by the IHFA with regard
to obtaining and servicing mortgage loans and all records relating to
the review, approval or rejection by the IHFA of said loans;
(c) Mortgage portfolio loan documents;


(d) Records of a current or former employee other than the employee's
duration of employment with the association, position held and loca-
tion of employment. This exemption from disclosure does not include the
contracts of employment or any remuneration, including reimbursement
of expenses, of the executive director, executive officers or commis-
sioners of the association. All other personnel information relating
to an association employee or applicant, including but not limited to
information regarding sex, race, marital status, birth date, home ad-
dress and telephone number, applications, testing and scoring materi-
als, grievances, correspondence, retirement plan information and per-
formance evaluations, shall not be disclosed to the public without the
employee's or applicant's written consent. An employee or authorized
representative may inspect and copy that employee's personnel records,
except for material used to screen and test for employment or material
not subject to disclosure elsewhere in the Idaho public records act.
(21) Records of the department of health and welfare related to child
support services in cases in which there is reasonable evidence of domestic
violence, as defined in chapter 63, title 39, Idaho Code, that can be used
to locate any individuals in the child support case except in response to a
court order.
(22) Records of the Idaho state bar lawyer assistance program pursuant
to chapter 49, title 54, Idaho Code, unless a participant in the program au-
thorizes the release pursuant to subsection (4) of section 54-4901, Idaho
Code.
(23) Records and information contained in the time-sensitive emergency
registry created by chapter 20, title 57, Idaho Code, together with any re-
ports, analyses and compilations created from such information and records.
(24) Records contained in the court files or other records prepared as
part of proceedings for judicial authorization of sterilization procedures
pursuant to chapter 39, title 39, Idaho Code.
(25) The physical voter registration application on file in the county
clerk's office; however, a redacted copy of said application shall be made
available consistent with the requirements of this section. Information
from the voter registration application maintained in the statewide voter
registration database, including age, will be made available except for
the voter's driver's license number, date of birth and, upon a showing that
the voter comes within the provisions of subsection (30) of this section or
upon showing of good cause by the voter to the county clerk in consultation
with the county prosecuting attorney, the physical residence address of the
voter. For the purposes of this subsection, good cause shall include the
protection of life and property and protection of victims of domestic vio-
lence and similar crimes.
(26) Information in the files of the health care directive registry
maintained by the department of health and welfare under section 39-4515,
Idaho Code, is confidential and shall not be disclosed to any person other
than to the person who executed an advance care planning document or the re-
vocation thereof and that person's surrogate decision-maker, to the person
who registered an advance care planning document or revocation thereof, and
to physicians, hospitals, medical personnel, nursing homes, and other per-
sons who have been granted access to the documents in the registry.


(27) Records in an address confidentiality program participant's file
as provided for in chapter 57, title 19, Idaho Code, other than the address
designated by the secretary of state, except under the following circum-
stances:
(a) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement
agency; or
(b) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the order.
(28) Except as otherwise provided by law relating to the release of in-
formation to a governmental entity or law enforcement agency, any personal
information, including but not limited to names, personal and business ad-
dresses and phone numbers, sex, height, weight, date of birth, social secu-
rity and driver's license numbers, or any other identifying numbers or in-
formation related to any Idaho fish and game licenses, permits and tags un-
less written consent is obtained from the affected person.
(29) Documents and records related to alternatives to discipline that
are maintained by the Idaho board of veterinary medicine under the provi-
sions of section 54-2118(1)(b), Idaho Code, provided the requirements set
forth therein are met.
(30) The Idaho residential street address and telephone number of an
eligible law enforcement or judicial officer and such officer's residing
household members as provided for in chapters 58 and 62, title 19, Idaho
Code, except under the following circumstances:
(a) If directed by a court order, to a person identified in the court
order;
(b) If requested by a law enforcement agency, to the law enforcement
agency;
(c) If requested by a financial institution or title company for busi-
ness purposes, to the requesting financial institution or title com-
pany; or
(d) If the law enforcement or judicial officer provides written permis-
sion for disclosure of such information.
(31) All information exchanged between the Idaho transportation de-
partment and insurance companies, any database created, all information
contained in the verification system and all reports, responses or other
information generated for the purposes of the verification system, pursuant
to section 49-1234, Idaho Code.
(32) Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of information
to the state controller as the state social security administrator as pro-
vided in section 59-1101A, Idaho Code.
(33) Personal information, including but not limited to property val-
ues, personal and business addresses, phone numbers, dates of birth, social
security and driver's license numbers or any other identifying numbers or
information maintained by the administrator of the unclaimed property law
set forth in chapter 5, title 14, Idaho Code. Nothing in this subsection
shall prohibit the release of names, last known city of residence, property
value ranges and general property information by the administrator for the
purpose of reuniting unclaimed property with its owner.
(34) Any personal information collected by the secretary of state,
pursuant to section 67-906(1)(b), Idaho Code, for the purpose of allowing
individuals to access the statewide electronic filing system authorized in


section 67-906, Idaho Code, except campaign contact phone numbers for candi-
dates or committees, which shall be publicly available upon request; and any
notification email addresses submitted as part of a lobbyist's registration
under section 67-6617, Idaho Code, of an employer, client, or designated
contact for the purpose of electronic notification of that employer, client,
or designated contact of a report filed under section 67-6619, Idaho Code.
(35) Records relating to a school employee who possesses an enhanced li-
cense to carry concealed weapons and desires to carry a concealed weapon on
school property pursuant to section 18-3302D, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.